Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.270

Risk management—Standard indemnification agreements.

The risk manager shall develop procedures for standard indemnification agreements for state agencies to use whenever the agency agrees to indemnify, or be indemnified by, any person or party. The risk manager shall also develop guidelines for the use of indemnification agreements by state agencies. On request of the risk manager, an agency shall forward to the office of risk management for review and approval any contract or agreement containing an indemnification agreement.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 517; 2002 c 332 s 21; 1989 c 419 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 332: See notes following RCW 43.19.760.

Intent—Effective date—1989 c 419: See notes following RCW 4.92.006.